New York, session 2025-2026, S1442.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 30 of subdivision (a) of section 1115 of the tax 2 law, as amended by section 84 of part A of chapter 56 of the laws of 3 1998, is amended to read as follows: 4 (30) Clothing and footwear for which the receipt or consideration 5 given or contracted to be given is less than [one] two hundred [ten] 6 fifty dollars per article of clothing, per pair of shoes or other arti- 7 cles of footwear or per item used or consumed to make or repair such 8 clothing and which becomes a physical component part of such clothing. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03962-01-5